Arkansas, session 2025, SB223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Religious freedom is a cornerstone of our democracy and is
essential to the dignity and freedom of every individual;
(2) Arkansas Constitution Article 14, § 1, provides that
"Intelligence and virtue being the safeguards of liberty and the bulwark of a
free and good government, the State shall ever maintain a general, suitable
and efficient system of free public schools and shall adopt all suitable
means to secure to the people the advantages and opportunities of
education.";
(3) An important advantage and essential opportunity of a system
of free public schools is for students to develop a virtuous lifestyle guided
by deeply held, meaningful values;
(4) Religious worldviews hold an important place in overall
human thought and philosophy;
(5) Religious freedom provides an environment and opportunity
for students to be exposed to worldviews that form the basis for civilization
and thought;
*TNL141*
02-18-2025 09:12:17 TNL141

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 SB223
(6) Religious freedom at public schools is a right that is
protected by state and federal law; and
(7) The United States Supreme Court has held in "Tinker v. Des
Moines", that neither students nor teachers “shed their constitutional rights
to freedom of speech or expression at the schoolhouse gate".
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Inform Arkansas residents regarding religious protections
and liberties;
(2) Ensure that this act serves only as a guide to clarify
religious rights at public schools, rather than as an exhaustive list of
religious rights at public schools; and
(3) Affirm that students and public school employees retain many
unlisted rights by virtue of their God-given freedoms, which extend beyond
those rights explicitly enumerated in this act.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 10, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-10-140. Religious Rights at Public Schools Act of 2025.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Religious
Rights at Public Schools Act of 2025".
(b) At the beginning of each school year, each public school district
and open-enrollment public charter school shall provide each enrolled student
and individual employed by the public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school with a copy of this act by electronic means or by
placement in a handbook, policy manual, or other resource designed to inform
students, employees, or parents about policies, procedures, or rights.
(c) Under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and
United States Supreme Court case law interpreting the First Amendment to the
United States Constitution, a student enrolled in a public school district or
an open-enrollment public charter school shall retain broad religious
freedom, which includes without limitation the right to:
(1) Pray silently or aloud, individually or in groups, at any
time when the student is permitted to speak freely and engage in discussions
of the student's own choosing;
(2) Pray by assembling on the property of the student's public
school district or open-enrollment public charter school in the same manner
02-18-2025 09:12:17 TNL141

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 SB223
that students are allowed to speak and assemble on the property of the
student's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school for
other activities;
(3) Promote legal religious activities on the property of the
student's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school in
the same manner that other activities are promoted;
(4) Display, print, recite, or discuss religious figures,
religious texts, and religious beliefs in the student's public school
district or open-enrollment public charter school assignments in which there
is student discretion in choosing topics or people of interest;
(5) Give a Bible or other religious text to any other person at
the student's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school
in the same manner that the student is allowed to give away other books or
texts;
(6) Individually or in groups conduct religious observances such
as speaking, singing, reading, or praying at times when students are free to
voluntarily converse and interact;
(7) Form and participate in religious clubs, groups, or
associations in the same manner that students form and participate in other
clubs, groups, or associations;
(8) Invite and host members of the clergy or other religious
leaders to the student's public school district or open-enrollment public
charter school in the same manner that other persons who are not enrolled in
the public school district or open-enrollment public charter school are
allowed to be present;
(9) Express a religious viewpoint in the same manner as other
viewpoints may be expressed in the student's public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school academic assignments, activities, speech, or
other expressions;
(10) Pray silently during any moment of silence observed during
the school day or at the student's public school district or open-enrollment
public charter school activities;
(11) Display and discuss the motto of the United States at the
student's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school;
(12) Read, discuss, and post documents of historical
significance that are of a religious nature or contain religious quotes or
02-18-2025 09:12:17 TNL141

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 SB223
references;
(13) Have a Bible or other religious text at the student's
public school district or open-enrollment public charter school in the same
manner that the student is allowed to have other books or texts at the
student's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school;
and
(14) Read a Bible or other religious text at the student's
public school district or open-enrollment public charter school in the same
manner that the student is allowed to read other books or texts at the
student's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school.
(d) Under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution and
United States Supreme Court case law interpreting the First Amendment to the
United States Constitution, an individual employed by a public school
district or an open-enrollment public charter school shall retain broad
religious freedom, which includes without limitation the right to:
(1) Pray silently during any moment of silence observed during
the school day or at the individual's public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school activities;
(2) Display and discuss the motto of the United States at the
individual's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school;
(3) Read, discuss, and post documents of historical significance
that are of a religious nature or contain religious quotes or references;
(4) Have a Bible or other religious text at the individual's
public school district or open-enrollment public charter school in the same
manner that the individual is allowed to have other books or texts at the
individual's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school;
and
(5) Read a Bible or other religious text at the individual's
public school district or open-enrollment public charter school in the same
manner that the individual is allowed to read other books or texts at the
individual's public school district or open-enrollment public charter school.
(e) A public school district and an open-enrollment public charter
school may:
(1) Have Bibles and other religious texts in public school
libraries, classrooms, and other places where books or texts are available to
public school district or open-enrollment public charter school students or
02-18-2025 09:12:17 TNL141

As Engrossed: S2/18/25 SB223
individuals employed by the public school district or open-enrollment public
charter school; and
(2) Offer an academic study of the Bible course as provided by §
6-16-145.

/s/M. Johnson






























02-18-2025 09:12:17 TNL141